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DTC B11 62/81 Short in Curtain Shield Squib RH
Circuit (to Ground)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The curtain shield squib RH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the curtain shield airbag as-
sembly RH.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS−3.
DTC B1162/81 is recorded when ground short is detected in the curtain shield squib RH circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B1162/81
S Short in curtain shield squib RH circuit (to ground)
S Curtain shield squib RH malfunction
S Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

S Curtain shield airbag assembly RH (Curtain shield squib RH)
S Airbag sensor assembly
S Floor No. 2 wire

HINT:
DTC B1162/81 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag.

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−693.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI−764).

2 Check floor No. 2 wire(curtain shield squib RH circuit).

CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and ICR+ of
the floor No. 2 wire connector on the curtain shield airbag as-
sembly RH (curtain shield squib RH) side.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orHigher

NG Repair or replace floor No. 2 wire.

OK
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3 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(b) Using a service wire, connect ICR+ and ICR− of the floor

No. 2 wire connector on the curtain shield airbag assem-
bly RH (curtain shield squib RH) side.

(c) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB 1162/81 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B1162/81 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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4 Check curtain shield squib RH.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the curtain shield airbag assembly RH (curtain

shield squib RH) connector.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toLOCK,andwaitat least for10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB 1162/81 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B1162/81 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace curtain shield airbag assembly RH
(curtain shield squib RH).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.


